Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-406
Existing structures; structures erected under authority of federal or state agency; zoning regulations; applicability of sections.

The provisions of sections 3-403 to 3-405 shall not apply to structures hereafter erected under the authority of a license or permit issued by a federal agency or other state agency now having specific statutory jurisdiction over the air space, including authority to prohibit or regulate the height of structures for the promotion of safety in aviation, nor to existing structures. Nothing in sections 3-401 to 3-409 shall be construed to limit or abridge any right, power, or authority to zone property under the provisions of any other law of this state or of the federal government except, that in the event of any conflict between the regulations for height limits of structures, lighting, and marking adopted under the provisions of sections 3-401 to 3-409, and any other regulations applicable to the same area, the more stringent limitation or requirement shall govern and prevail.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 6, p. 69.